Maine, session 132, LD453.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4311, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. SSSS, §1, is
further amended to read:
1. Departmental reimbursement. When a municipality incurs net general assistance
costs in any fiscal year prior to July 1, 2015 in excess of .0003 of that municipality's most
recent state valuation relative to the state fiscal year for which reimbursement is being
issued, as determined by the State Tax Assessor in the statement filed as provided in Title
36, section 381, the Department of Health and Human Services shall reimburse the
municipality for 90% of the amount in excess of these expenditures when the department
finds that the municipality has been in compliance with all requirements of this chapter. If
a municipality elects to determine need without consideration of funds distributed from any
municipally-controlled municipally controlled trust fund that must otherwise be considered
for purposes of this chapter, the department shall reimburse the municipality for 66 2/3%
of the amount in excess of such expenditures when the department finds that the
municipality has otherwise been in compliance with all requirements of this chapter.
The department shall reimburse each municipality and each Indian tribe 70% of the direct
costs incurred by that municipality or tribe on or after July 1, 2015 and prior to January 1,
2026 for the general assistance program granted by that municipality or tribe. For the
purposes of this subsection, "Indian tribe" has the same meaning as in section 411,
subsection 8‑A.
Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall reimburse each municipality and each
Indian tribe 90% of the direct costs incurred by that municipality or tribe for the general
assistance program granted by that municipality or tribe.
For the purposes of this subsection, "Indian tribe" has the same meaning as in section 411,
subsection 8‑A.